Idaho, session 2025, H0334.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 17, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1734J, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1734J. EASTERN SNAKE PLAIN AQUIFER MANAGED RECHARGE GOAL. The
Idaho water resource board shall revise state water plan policies 4B, 4D, and
4E and the eastern Snake plain aquifer comprehensive aquifer management plan
to establish a managed recharge goal for the eastern Snake plain aquifer of
three hundred fifty thousand (350,000) acre-feet on an average annual basis.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.